src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv7_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: vørr
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: vørr
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: vørr
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: varrar
    vørr+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: varrar
    vørr+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: [vørrum, varrum]
    vørr+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: varra
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: vørrin
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: vørrina
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: vørrini
    vørr+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: varrarinnar
    vørr+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: varrarnar
    vørr+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [vørrunum, varrunum]
    vørr+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: varranna
